Maryland, session 2026, HB1469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Insurance Administration shall convene a workgroup to study
the definition of “specialty drug”.
(b) The workgroup shall consist of the following members:
(1) two representatives of pharmacy benefits managers;
(2) two representatives of independent pharmacists;
(3) one representative of a carrier that owns a pharmacy benefit manager;
(4) one representative of a carrier that does not own a pharmacy benefit
manager;
(5) one representative of a managed care organization;
(6) one representative of a hospital; and
(7) one representative of a health care provider that is not a hospital.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1469*

HOUSE BILL 1469
(c) The workgroup shall study the definition of “specialty drug” established under
§ 15–847 of the Insurance Article to:
(1) determine:
(i) which stakeholders benefit from the definition;
(ii) which stakeholders are disadvantaged by the definition;
(iii) how each stakeholder group applies the definition;
(iv) the impact of the definition on patients; and
(v) any unintended consequences of the definition;
(2) compare the definition to other definitions of “specialty drug” used in:
(i) federal law;
(ii) other states’ laws, and
(iii) international law; and
(3) make a recommendation for a new definition of “specialty drug” that is
in the best interest of patients and all stakeholders in the State.
(d) On or before January 1, 2027, the Maryland Insurance Administration shall
report the workgroup’s findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.